Georgia statutes. TITLE 25 Fire Protection and Safety
CHAPTER 2 Regulation of Fire and Other Hazards to Persons and Property Generally
25-2-22.1.
Inspection warrants.

The Commissioner, his delegate, or any other person authorized under this title to conduct inspections of property, in addition to other procedures now or hereafter provided, may obtain an inspection warrant under the conditions specified in this Code section. Such warrant shall authorize the Commissioner or his delegate or such authorized person to conduct a search or inspection of property either with or without the consent of the person whose property is to be searched or inspected if such search or inspection is one that is elsewhere authorized under this title or the rules and regulations duly promulgated hereunder.

Inspection warrants may be issued by any judge of the superior, state, municipal, or magistrate court upon proper oath or affirmation showing probable cause for the purpose of conducting inspections authorized by this title or rules promulgated under this title and for the seizure of property or the taking of samples appropriate to the inspection. For the purposes of issuance of inspection warrants, probable cause exists upon showing a valid public interest in the effective enforcement of this title or rules promulgated under this title sufficient to justify inspection of the area, premise, building, or conveyance in the circumstances specified in the application for the warrant.

A warrant shall be issued only upon affidavit of the Commissioner or his designee or any person authorized to conduct inspections pursuant to this title, sworn to before the judicial officer and establishing the grounds for issuing the warrant. The issuing judge may issue the warrant when he is satisfied that the following conditions are met:

The one seeking the warrant must establish under oath or affirmation that the property to be inspected is to be inspected as a part of a legally authorized program of inspection which includes that property or that there is probable cause for believing that there is a condition, object, activity, or circumstance which legally justifies such an inspection of that property; and

The issuing judge determines that the issuance of the warrant is authorized by this Code section.

The warrant shall:

State the grounds for its issuance and the name of each person whose affidavit has been taken in support thereof;

Be directed to persons authorized by this title to conduct inspections to execute it;

Command the persons to whom it is directed to inspect the area, premise, building, or conveyance identified for the purpose specified and, if appropriate, direct the seizure of the property specified;

Identify the item or types of property to be seized, if any; and

Designate the judicial officer to whom it shall be returned.

A warrant issued pursuant to this Code section must be executed and returned within ten days of its date of issuance unless, upon a showing of a need for additional time, the court orders otherwise. If property is seized pursuant to a warrant, a copy shall be provided upon request to the person from whom or from whose premises the property is taken, together with a receipt for the property taken. The return of the warrant shall be made promptly, accompanied by a written inventory of any property taken. A copy of the inventory shall be delivered upon request to the person from whom or from whose premises the property was taken and to the applicant for the warrant.

The judicial officer who has issued a warrant shall attach thereto a copy of the return and all papers returnable in connection therewith and file them with the clerk of the superior court for the county in which the inspection was made.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-22.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 815, § 1.

25-2-23.
Issuance of notice to correct unsafe conditions.

When any of the officers listed in Code Section 25-2-22 finds any building or other structure which, for want of repair or by reason of age or dilapidated condition or any other cause is especially liable to fire hazard or which is so situated as to endanger other property or the safety of the public, or when, in or around any building, such officer finds combustible or explosive matter, inflammables, or other conditions dangerous to the safety of the building, notice may be given to the owner or agent and occupant of the building to correct such unsafe conditions as may be found.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 20.

25-2-24.
Filing of petition for court order compelling compliance with notice.

If any owner, agent, or occupant fails to comply with the notice prescribed in Code Section 25-2-23 within the time specified in the notice, the state fire marshal or his delegated officials, with the approval of the Commissioner, may petition the court for a rule nisi to show cause why an order should not be issued by the court that the same be removed or remedied. Such court order shall forthwith be complied with by the owner or occupant of the premises or building within such time as may be fixed in the court order.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 20.

25-2-25.
Remedy of unsafe conditions by city or county upon failure to comply with court order; liability for expenses generally; issuance of fi. fa. against owner of property for expense incurred.

If any person fails to comply with the order of the court made pursuant to Code Section 25-2-24 within the time fixed, the city or county in which the building or premises in question are located shall cause the building or premises to be forthwith repaired, torn down, or demolished, the hazardous materials removed, or the dangerous conditions remedied, as the case may be, at the expense of the city or county in which the property is situated. If the owner thereof, within 30 days after notice in writing of the amount of such expense, fails, neglects, or refuses to repay the city or county the expense thereby incurred, the local authorities shall issue a fi. fa. against the owner of the property for the expense actually incurred.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 20.

25-2-26.
Final authority for ordering enforcement of Code Sections 25-2-22 through 25-2-25.

Code Sections 25-2-22 through 25-2-25 shall be construed so that the final authority for ordering the carrying out and enforcement of such Code sections shall be by order of the court and not by the Commissioner or his delegated authority.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 20.

25-2-27.
Procedure for investigation of suspected arson — Taking of testimony; arrest of suspect; furnishing of information to district attorney.

The state fire marshal or his deputy, when in his opinion such proceedings are necessary, shall take the testimony on oath of all persons believed to be cognizant of or to have information or knowledge in relation to suspected arson and shall cause the testimony to be reduced to writing. If he is of the opinion that there is evidence sufficient to charge any person with the crime of arson, he shall cause such person to be arrested in accordance with the law. He shall also furnish the district attorney of the circuit in which the fire occurred with all the information obtained by him in his investigation. The district attorney shall thereupon proceed according to law.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 21.

Cross references.

Arson and explosives generally, §

16-7-60

et seq.

25-2-28.
Procedure for investigation of suspected arson — Issuance of subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses or production of documents; administration of oaths; issuance of court order compelling compliance.

The state fire marshal or the deputy state fire marshal shall have the power to summon and compel the attendance of witnesses before either or both of them, in any county in which the witness resides, to testify in relation to any matter which is designated by Code Section 25-2-27 as a subject of inquiry and to issue subpoenas to compel the production of all books, records, documents, and papers pertaining to such subject of inquiry. The state fire marshal and deputy state fire marshal may also administer oaths and affirmations to persons appearing as witnesses before them. Any person summoned shall have the right of counsel at the hearing if he desires.

Should any person fail to comply with this Code section, the state fire marshal or his agent is authorized to procure an order from the superior court of the county in which the proposed witness resides, requiring compliance under the law.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 22.

25-2-29.
Hearing procedure.

All hearings held by or under the direction of the Commissioner shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and the Commissioner may also satisfy the procedure for conduct of hearings on contested cases and rule making required under said chapter by following and complying with Chapter 2 of Title 33.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 23; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 8.

25-2-30.
Duty of state fire marshal as to promotion of fire prevention and life safety generally.

It shall be the duty of the state fire marshal to contact individuals, associations, and state agencies, both within and outside this state, which have a direct interest in the fundamentals of fire prevention and life safety, for the purpose of promoting the objectives of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 28.

25-2-31.
Dissemination of fire prevention information by state fire marshal generally; fire prevention programs in schools; cooperation with state fire marshal by local authorities.

The state fire marshal may promote any plan or program which tends to disseminate information on fire prevention and similar projects and may aid any association or group of individuals which is primarily organized along such lines.

It shall be the duty of the state fire marshal to carry on a state-wide program of fire prevention education in the schools of this state and to establish fire drills therein. All local school authorities are required to cooperate with the state fire marshal in carrying out programs designed to protect the lives of school children from fire and related hazards.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 26.

25-2-32.
Maintenance of records of fire losses; reports of losses by insurance companies; reports of fires.

It shall be the duty of the state fire marshal to keep an up-to-date record of all fire losses, together with statistical data concerning the same. The various fire insurance companies doing business in this state shall submit to the Commissioner, quarterly, a report stating all the losses sustained by them, together with such pertinent data as may be required by the Commissioner.

Effective January 1, 1993, all incidents of fires, whether accidental or incendiary, shall be reported to the office of Safety Fire Commissioner. Every fire department shall submit incident data either via a uniform electronic reporting method or on a uniform reporting form prescribed by the Commissioner and at intervals established by the Commissioner.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 25; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 9; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “the” preceding “Safety Fire Commissioner” in the first sentence of subsection (b).

Cross references.

Property insurance generally, T. 33, C. 32.

25-2-32.1.
Reports to Safety Fire Division of serious burn injuries.

Every case of a burn injury or wound where the victim sustained second-degree or third-degree burns to 5 percent or more of the body or any burns to the upper respiratory tract or laryngeal edema due to the inhalation of superheated air, and every case of a burn injury or wound which is likely to or may result in death, shall be reported at once to the Safety Fire Division of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance. The Safety Fire Division shall accept the report and notify the proper investigatory agency as may be appropriate.
A written report shall be provided to the Safety Fire Division within 72 hours.
The report shall be made by the physician attending or treating the case or by the manager, superintendent, or other person in charge whenever such case is treated in a hospital sanitarium, institution, or other medical facility.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-32.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 10.

25-2-32.2.
Investigation of burn injuries reported pursuant to Code Section 25-2-32.1.

Every county or municipal governing authority or any two or more governing authorities or the Safety Fire Division are authorized and empowered to take such action as may be required to formulate task forces, teams, or fire or police investigative units to investigate any case of a burn injury or wound sustained as reported pursuant to Code Section 25-2-32.1, to ascertain the cause of fires or explosions of suspicious origin within the county or municipalities, to pursue necessary investigation thereof, and to assist in the preparation and prosecution of cases stemming from any alleged criminal activity attendant to such fires or explosions.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-32.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 10.

25-2-33.
Release of fire loss information by insurers on request by state or local official; immunity for furnishing of information; confidentiality of information received; testimony by officials in action against insurer.

The state fire marshal, any deputy designated by the state fire marshal, the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation or the chief of a fire department of any municipal corporation or county where a fire department is established may request any insurance company investigating a fire loss of real or personal property to release any information in its possession relative to that loss. The company shall release the information to and cooperate with any official authorized to request such information pursuant to this Code section. The information to be released shall include, but is not limited to:

Any insurance policy relevant to the fire loss under investigation and any application for such a policy;

Policy premium payment records on the policy, to the extent available;

Any history of previous claims made by the insured for fire loss with the reporting carrier; and

Material relating to the investigation of the loss, including statements of any person, proof of loss, and any other relevant evidence.

If an insurance company has reason to suspect that a fire loss to its insured’s real or personal property was caused by incendiary means, the company shall notify the state fire marshal and furnish him with all relevant material acquired by the company during its investigation of the fire loss. The insurer shall also cooperate with and take such action as may be requested of it by the state fire marshal’s office or by any law enforcement agency of competent jurisdiction. The company shall also permit any person to inspect its records pertaining to the policy and to the loss if the person is authorized to do so by law or by an appropriate order of a superior court of competent jurisdiction.

In the absence of fraud or malice, no insurance company or person who furnishes information on its behalf shall be liable for damages in a civil action or subject to criminal prosecution for any oral or written statement made or any other action taken which is necessary to supply information required pursuant to this Code section.

The officials and departmental and agency personnel receiving any information furnished pursuant to this Code section shall hold the information in confidence until such time as its release is required pursuant to a criminal or civil proceeding, provided that nothing contained in this Code section shall be deemed to prohibit representatives of the state fire marshal’s office or other authorized law enforcement officials from discussing such matters with other agency or departmental personnel or with other law enforcement officials or from releasing or disclosing any such information during the conduct of their investigation, if the release or disclosure is necessary to enable them to conduct their investigation in an orderly and efficient manner; provided, further, that nothing contained in this Code section shall prohibit an insurance company which furnishes information to an authorized agency or agencies pursuant to this Code section from having the right to request relevant information and receive, within a reasonable time not to exceed 30 days, the information requested.

Any official referred to in subsection (a) of this Code section may be required to testify as to any information in his possession regarding the fire loss of real or personal property in any civil action against an insurance company for the fire loss in which any person seeks recovery under a policy.

No person shall purposely refuse to release any information requested pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section.

No person shall purposely refuse to notify the state fire marshal of a fire loss required to be reported pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

No person shall purposely refuse to supply the state fire marshal with pertinent information required to be furnished pursuant to subsection (b) of this Code section.

No person shall purposely fail to hold in confidence information required to be held in confidence by subsection (d) of this Code section.

Any person willfully violating this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 1232, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 25; Ga. L. 2005, p. 599, § 7/SB 146.

Cross references.

Property insurance generally, T. 33, C. 32.

25-2-33.1.
Reports of arson and suspected arson to state fire marshal and insurers; notification of payment of claim as to which report filed.

The fire department of each county and municipality and any other organized fire department operating within this state shall report every incident or suspected incident of arson to the local law enforcement agency, the state fire marshal, and every insurance company with a known pecuniary interest in the cause of the fire in which arson is involved or suspected to be involved. In any local jurisdiction where an organized fire department is not operating, the local law enforcement agency investigating a fire shall make the reports required by this Code section. Such reports shall be made on forms provided for that purpose by the state fire marshal.

Any insurance company which has received a report of an incident or suspected incident of arson under subsection (a) of this Code section shall not pay any claim relating thereto prior to notifying in writing the state fire marshal and local fire department of the date the claim is to be paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-33.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 792, § 1.

25-2-34.
Cooperation with Commissioner, deputies and inspectors by Department of Public Safety and Georgia State Patrol.

The Department of Public Safety, the Georgia State Patrol, and the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall cooperate with the Commissioner and his deputies and inspectors whenever called upon by him or them in enforcing this chapter. They shall make available to the Commissioner or his deputies and inspectors such facilities as lie detectors, broadcasting facilities, and other aid and devices as requested.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 24.

25-2-35.
Payment of sheriffs and other peace officers for assistance in determining causes of fires, etc.

The Commissioner is authorized to pay sheriffs and other peace officers reasonable fees for assistance given in assembling evidence as to the causes or criminal origin of fires and in apprehending persons guilty of arson.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 24.

Cross references.

Arson and explosives, §

16-7-60

et seq.

25-2-36.
Remedies for violations of provisions of chapter and rules, regulations, or orders of Commissioner — Injunctive relief.

In addition to the civil monetary penalty provided for in Code Section 25-2-37, the Commissioner may bring a civil action to enjoin a violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter. In particular, but not by way of limitation upon the authority granted in this Code section, the Commissioner may bring an action to enjoin any construction found to be in contravention of Code Section 25-2-13 or 25-2-14 or to obtain an order of court directing the immediate evacuation and the secure closure of any structure which, by reason of violation of any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter, is found to pose an immediate threat to the property, health, or lives of the occupants of the structure. In order to avail himself of the remedies provided for in this Code section, it shall not be necessary for the Commissioner to allege or to prove the absence of an adequate remedy at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 894, § 2.

25-2-37.
Locking exit doors; construction of building without approval of plans; civil penalties for violation of chapter or rules.

It shall be unlawful for any person to lock an exit door whether or not it is a required exit unless such provisions are allowed by this chapter or by any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter.

It shall be unlawful for any person to begin construction on any proposed building or structure which comes under the classification in paragraph (1) of subsection (b) of Code Section 25-2-13 and which comes under the jurisdiction of the office of the Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to Code Section 25-2-12 without first having plans approved in accordance with Code Section 25-2-14.

Any person who violates this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty imposed by the Commissioner in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner.

Any person who violates this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the Commissioner under this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each day that the violation persists after such person is notified of the Commissioner’s intent to impose such penalty and of the right to a hearing with respect to same.

Any person violating subsection (a), (b), or (c) of this Code section shall be subject to a fine of not more than $1,000.00 for a first offense, not less than $1,000.00 and not more than $2,000.00 for a second offense, and not less than $2,000.00 and not more than $5,000.00 for a third or subsequent offense.

History.

Ga. L. 1972, p. 894, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 11.

25-2-38.
Remedies for violations of provisions of chapter and rules, regulations, or orders of Commissioner — Criminal penalty.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating this chapter or failing or refusing to comply with any regulation promulgated under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 32.

25-2-38.1.
Sovereign immunity; effect of this chapter on legal duties of property owners and lessees.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to constitute a waiver of the sovereign immunity of the state, or any officer or employee thereof, in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. No action shall be maintained against the state, any municipality, county, or any officer, elected officer or employees thereof, for damages sustained as a result of any fire or related hazard covered in this chapter by reason of any inspection or other action taken or not taken pursuant to this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve any property owner or lessee thereof from any legal duty, obligation, or liability incident to the ownership, maintenance, or use of such property.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 1779, § 9.

Cross references.

Nonliability of counties in absence of statute, §

36-1-4

.

Liability of municipal corporations for acts or omissions of officers, T. 36, C. 33.

Immunity of state and political subdivisions for emergency management activities, §

38-3-35

.

Immunity of officers, members, and others of county and municipal fire departments from liability for acts performed while fighting fires or for acts performed at scenes of emergency, §§ 51-1-29, 51-1-30.

25-2-39.
Construction of chapter.

It is declared that this chapter is necessary for the public safety, health, peace, and welfare, is remedial in nature, and shall be construed liberally.

History.

Ga. L. 1949, p. 1057, § 30.

25-2-40.
Smoke detectors required in new dwellings and dwelling units; exceptions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this Code section, on and after July 1, 1987, every new dwelling and every new dwelling unit within an apartment, house, condominium, and townhouse and every motel, hotel, and dormitory shall be provided with an approved listed smoke detector installed in accordance with the manufacturer’s recommendations and listing.

On and after July 1, 1994, every dwelling and every dwelling unit within an apartment, house, condominium, and townhouse and every motel, hotel, and dormitory which was constructed prior to July 1, 1987, shall have installed an approved battery operated smoke detector which shall be maintained in good working order unless any such building is otherwise required to have a smoke detector system pursuant to Code Section 25-2-13.

On and after July 1, 2001, every patient sleeping room of every nursing home shall be provided with no less than an approved listed battery operated single station smoke detector installed in accordance with their listing. Such detectors shall be maintained in good working order by the operator of such nursing home. This paragraph shall not apply to nursing homes equipped with automatic sprinkler systems.

In dwellings, dwelling units, and other facilities listed in subsection (a) of this Code section, a smoke detector shall be mounted on the ceiling or wall at a point centrally located in the corridor or area giving access to each group of rooms used for sleeping purposes. Where the dwelling or dwelling unit contains more than one story, detectors are required on each story including cellars and basements, but not including uninhabitable attics; provided, however, that hotels and motels which are protected throughout by an approved supervised automatic sprinkler system installed in accordance with the rules and regulations of the Commissioner shall be exempt from the requirement to install smoke detectors in interior corridors but shall be subject to all other applicable requirements imposed under Code Section 25-2-13.

In dwellings, dwelling units, and other facilities listed in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section with split levels, a smoke detector need be installed only on the upper level, provided the lower level is less than one full story below the upper level, except that if there is a door between levels then a detector is required on each level. Such detectors shall be connected to a sounding device or other detector to provide an alarm which will be audible in the sleeping areas.

Detectors shall be listed and meet the installation requirements of NFPA 72. In addition, a one and one-half hour emergency power supply source is required on all detection systems required by this chapter and permitted after April 1, 1992, except where battery operated smoke detectors are allowed.

Any complete automatic fire alarm system using automatic smoke detectors shall be installed in accordance with NFPA 72.

The provisions of this Code section may be enforced by local building and fire code officials in the case of residential buildings which are not covered by Code Section 25-2-13; provided, however, that this Code section shall not establish a special duty on said officials to inspect such residential facilities for compliance with this Code section; provided, further, that inspections shall not be conducted for the purpose of determining compliance with this Code section absent reasonable cause to suspect other building or fire code violations. The jurisdiction enforcing this Code section shall retain any fines collected pursuant to this subsection.

Any occupant who fails to maintain a smoke detector in a dwelling, dwelling unit, or other facility, other than a nursing home, listed in subsection (a) of this Code section in good working order as required in this Code section shall be subject to a maximum fine of $25.00, provided that a warning shall be issued for a first violation.

Any operator of a nursing home who fails to install and maintain the smoke detectors required under paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section shall be sanctioned in accordance with Code Section 31-2-8.

Failure to maintain a smoke detector in good working order in a dwelling, dwelling unit, or other facility listed in subsection (a) of this Code section in violation of this Code section shall not be considered evidence of negligence, shall not be considered by the court on any question of liability of any person, corporation, or insurer, shall not be any basis for cancellation of coverage or increase in insurance rates, and shall not diminish any recovery for damages arising out of the ownership, maintenance, or occupancy of such dwelling, dwelling unit, or other facility listed in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The Safety Fire Commissioner is authorized and encouraged to inform the public through public service announcements of the availability of a limited number of battery operated smoke detectors which may be obtained by persons in need without charge from the office of Safety Fire Commissioner or local fire departments.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-40

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 989, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2186, § 12; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1235, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 860, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-9/HB 228; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 4-7/HB 214; Ga. L. 2015, p. 5, § 25/HB 90.

The 2015 amendment,

effective March 13, 2015, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, deleted “the” preceding “Safety Fire Commissioner” near the end of subsection (h).

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on real property law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 383 (2000).

For annual survey of local government law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 351 (2004).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “Commissioner” was substituted for “commissioner” in subsection (b); and “battery operated” was substituted for “battery-operated” in subsections (d) and (h).

25-2-41.
Use of class B fire-fighting foam.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Class B fire-fighting foam” means any foam designed to extinguish flammable liquid fires.

“PFAS chemicals” means a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated carbon atom, including perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances, and designed to be fully functional in class B fire-fighting foam formulations.

“Testing” means calibration testing, conformance testing, or fixed system testing.

On and after January 1, 2020, no person; fire department provided for under Chapter 3 of this title; state department, agency, board, bureau, office, commission, public corporation, or authority; county, municipal corporation, school district, or other political subdivision of this state shall discharge or otherwise use class B fire-fighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals unless:

Such discharge or other use occurs in fire prevention or in response to an emergency fire-fighting operation; or

Such discharge or other use is for training or testing purposes which occurs at a facility that has implemented containment, treatment, and disposal measures to prevent uncontrolled releases of such class B fire-fighting foam into the environment.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to:

Restrict the manufacture, sale, or distribution of class B fire-fighting foam that contains intentionally added PFAS chemicals or restrict the discharge or other use of class B fire-fighting foam in response to an emergency fire-fighting operation; or

Prevent the use of nonfluorinated foams, including other class B fire-fighting foams, for purposes of training for fire-fighting operations.

History.

Code 1981, §

25-2-41

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 718, § 1/HB 458.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.